Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.902

Savings—1987 c 443.

This chapter shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or obligations incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this chapter or under any rule, regulation, or order adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted under those sections.

[ 1987 c 443 s 14.]